lexd/preposition.lexd
####################
### PREPOSITIONS ###
####################

PATTERNS
Preposition [<prep>:]

# глоссы из внутреннего документа экспедиций ВШЭ в город Хорог
LEXICON Preposition
ар
аз
ас
ба
чи
пар
пи
пис
тар
то
